en: Violet Syrups
de: Veilchensirups
fr: Sirops de violette, sirop de violette
hr: Sirupi od ljubičice
nl: Viooltjessiropen, Viooltjessiroop

en: Syrups with camomile flavouring, Syrups with chamomile flavoring, Camomile flavoured syrups, Chamomile flavored syrups
da: Sirupper med kamillesmag
sv: Siraper med kamomillsmak

en: Cordials, Squashes (Drink), Diluting juices, Water juices
da: Saftevand

en: Elderflower cordials
da: Hyldeblomstsaftevand
sv: Fläderblomssafter, Hyllesafter

en: Blackcurrant cordials
da: Solbærsaftevand

en: Pear cordials
da: Pæresaftevand

en: Raspberry and craneberry cordials
da: Hindbær- og tranebærsaftevand

en: Iced teas, Ice teas
bg: Студен чай
ca: Te gelat
da: Iste
de: Eistees
es: Tés helados, Tés fríos
fi: jääteet
fr: Thés glacés, Ice-tea, thé glacé
hr: Ledeni čajevi
hu: Jeges teák, Jeges tea
it: Thè freddi
ja: アイスティー
lt: Šalta arbata, Šaltos arbatos
nl: Ice teas, Ice tea, Icetea
pl: Herbaty mrożone, Herbata mrożona
pt: Chás gelados
ru: Холодные чаи
tr: Soğuk çay
zh: 冰柠檬茶

en: Tea-based beverages, Tea beverages
de: Teegetränke, Teebasierte Getränke
es: Bebidas de té
fi: Teepohjaiset juomat
fr: Boissons au thé, Thés infusés, boissons à base de thé, Boissons aromatisées au thé
hr: Pića na bazi čaja
hu: Teaalapú italok
it: Bevande a base di tè
lt: Arbatos gėrimai, Nealkoholiniai gaivieji gėrimai su arbatos ekstraktu ir cukrumi bei saldikliais
nl: Dranken op basis van thee
pt: Bebidas à base de chá
sv: Tebaserade drycker
zh: 茶饮料

en: Brewed tea without sugar
fr: Thé infusé non sucré

en: Herbal tea beverages
de: Kräutertee Getränke
fi: Yrttiteejuomat
fr: Tisanes infusées, Boissons à la tisane
hr: Napitci od biljnih čajeva
nl: Fusion dranken, Dranken met kruidenthee-extract, Dranken met kruidenthee-extracten

en: Brewed infusions without sugar
fr: Tisanes infusées non sucrées

en: Light iced teas
de: Kalorienarme Eistees, Eistee light, Diät Eistees
es: Tés helados ligeros, Tés helados light
fr: Ice-tea light, thés glacés lights, thé glacé light
hr: Lagani ledeni čajevi
hu: Diétás jeges teák, Light jeges teák
nl: Light ice teas, Light ice tea

en: Peach flavored iced teas
de: Pfirsicheistees
fi: persikan makuiset jääteet
fr: Thés glacés saveur pêche
hr: Ledeni čajevi s okusom breskve
hu: Barack ízű jeges teák, Barack ízesítésű jeges teák
it: Tè freddo alla pesca
lt: Persikų skonio šaltosios arbatos
nl: Perziken Ice Teas, Perziken Ice Tea, Perzik Ice Tea, Perzik Ice Teas
pt: Chás gelados com sabor a pera
tr: Şeftalili soğuk çay
zh: 桃味冰茶

en: Iced teas with raspberry flavor
de: Himbeereistees
fr: Thés glacés saveur framboise
hr: Ledeni čajevi s okusom maline
lt: Aviečių skonio šaltosios arbatos
nl: Frambozen Ice Teas, Frambozen Ice Tea

en: Iced teas with mint flavor
de: Minzeistees, Pfefferminzeistees
fr: Thés glacés saveur menthe
hr: Ledeni čajevi s okusom mente
lt: Mėtų skonio šaltosios arbatos
nl: Pepermunt Ice Teas, Pepermunt Ice Tea, Munt Ice Teas

en: Iced teas with mango flavor
de: Mangoeistees
fr: Thés glacés saveur mangue
hr: Ledeni čajevi s okusom manga
lt: Mangų skonio šaltosios arbatos
nl: Mango Ice Teas, Mango Ice Tea
pt: Chás gelados com sabor a manga

en: Lemon flavored iced teas
de: Zitroneneistees
fi: Sitruunan makuiset jääteet
fr: Thés glacés saveur citron
hr: Ledeni čajevi s okusom limuna
hu: Citromos ízesítésű jeges teák, Citrom ízű jeges teák
it: Tè freddo al limone
lt: Citrinų skonio šaltosios arbatos
nl: Citroen Ice Teas, Citroen Ice Tea
pt: Chás gelados com sabor a limão

en: Iced teas preparations
de: Eistee Zubereitung, Eistee Präparate
fr: Préparations pour thés glacés
hr: Pripravci ledenih čajeva
lt: Šaltosios arbatos preparatai
nl: Ice Tea Bereidingen, Ice Tea Bereiding
pt: Preparados para chás gelados

en: Coffee drinks, Coffee drink, coffee beverages
de: Kaffeegetränke, Kaffeegetränk
es: Bebidas de café
fi: kahvijuomat
fr: Boissons au café, boissons à base de café
hr: Napitci od kave
hu: Kávéitalok, Kávés italok
it: Bevande al caffè
lt: Kavos gėrimai, Kavos gėrimas
nl: Koffiedranken, Koffiedrank